Montana, session 2025, HB142.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 5-5-215, MCA, is amended to read:
"5-5-215. Duties of interim committees. (1) Each interim committee shall:
(a) review administrative rules within its jurisdiction;
(b) subject to 5-5-217(3), conduct interim studies as assigned;
(c) monitor the operation of assigned executive branch agencies with specific attention to the
following:
(i) identification of issues likely to require future legislative attention;
(ii) opportunities to improve existing law through the analysis of problems experienced with the
application of the law by an agency; and
(iii) experiences of the state's citizens with the operation of an agency that may be amenable to
improvement through legislative action;
(d) review, if requested by any member of the interim committee, the statutorily established
advisory councils and required reports of assigned agencies to make recommendations to the next legislature
on retention or elimination of any advisory council or required reports pursuant to 5-11-210;
(e) review proposed legislation of assigned agencies or entities as provided in the joint legislative
rules;
(f) accumulate, compile, analyze, and furnish information bearing upon its assignment and
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 142
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 142
relevant to existing or prospective legislation as it determines, on its own initiative, to be pertinent to the
adequate completion of its work; and
(g) review proposed statewide initiatives as defined in 13-27-110 within the interim committee's
subject area and vote to either support or not support the placement of the text of the proposed statewide
initiative on the ballot in accordance with 13-27-228.
(2) Each interim committee shall prepare bills and resolutions that, in its opinion, the welfare of the
state may require for presentation to the next regular session of the legislature. An interim committee may by
vote request four five bill drafts on a partisan basis and an unlimited number of bill drafts on a bipartisan basis.
(3) The legislative services division shall keep accurate records of the activities and proceedings of
each interim committee.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) "bipartisan basis" means a vote in which members from more than one party vote to request a
bill draft; and
(b) "partisan basis" means a vote in which members from only one the majority party vote to
request a bill draft."
Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 142
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 142, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 142
INTRODUCED BY L. SCHUBERT, S. FITZPATRICK
AN ACT REVISING LAWS RELATED TO INTERIM COMMITTEE BILL DRAFTS; CLARIFYING THE TERM
PARTISAN BASIS; INCREASING THE NUMBER OF DRAFT REQUESTS THAT CAN BE REQUESTED ON A
PARTISAN BASIS; AMENDING SECTION 5-5-215, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE
DATE.”